New York, session 2025-2026, S4723.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative intent. The legislature finds and declares that 2 the continued displacement of individuals with disabilities caused by 3 the closure or suspension of services at various state-operated insti- 4 tutions due to staffing and other issues must be assessed and remedied. 5 The legislature further finds that in order to assess these ongoing 6 staffing issues, the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 7 mental disabilities shall submit a report to the governor, the temporary 8 president of the senate, and the speaker of the assembly on or before 9 December 31, 2025 detailing the number and nature of state-operated 10 residential facilities serving individuals with developmental disabili- 11 ties, a census of staff delivering services at state-operated facilities 12 to individuals with developmental disabilities and the hiring of new 13 staff at state-operated residential facilities. 14 § 2. Such report shall include, but not be limited to, the following 15 information: 16 1. the total number of full-time equivalent staff by position or title 17 for the office for people with developmental disabilities as of April 1, 18 2025; 19 2. the 2025-2026 fiscal year full-time equivalent budgeted staffing 20 level by position or title for the office for people with developmental 21 disabilities as of April 1, 2025; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02959-01-5 S. 4723 2 1 3. the number of full-time equivalent staff that separated from 2 service between April 1, 2025 and December 1, 2025, including a break- 3 down of each staff member's job title and job location; 4 4. the number of staff hired from April 1, 2025 to December 1, 2025, 5 including a breakdown of each staff member's job title and job location; 6 5. the number of unfilled and vacant positions as of December 1, 2025 7 at each state-operated facility; 8 6. the number of full-time equivalent staff as of December 1, 2025; 9 7. the steps taken by the office for people with developmental disa- 10 bilities to recruit staff for new and vacant positions; 11 8. a list of state-operated residential facilities operated by the 12 office for people with developmental disabilities detailing which facil- 13 ities are owned or leased, and the lease end date, if any. Such list 14 shall include whether such facilities are operational, have suspended 15 services or have been closed and the proposed date at which any facili- 16 ties that have suspended services or have been closed are projected to 17 be re-opened to serve individuals with developmental disabilities; 18 9. the number of eligible clients with developmental disabilities 19 currently on a waiting list to receive care; and 20 10. any other information the commissioner of the office for people 21 with developmental disabilities deems necessary and appropriate for the 22 legislature to assess the ability of the office for people with develop- 23 mental disabilities to deliver needed services to individuals with 24 developmental disabilities or to reduce the number of individuals with 25 developmental disabilities awaiting placement for services in a state- 26 operated residential facility. 27 § 3. Such report shall be posted for public inspection on the office 28 for people with developmental disabilities' website. 29 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.